Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-83] Registration of all existing
wells. Any person owning or operating any well shall register the well
with the commission. Registration shall be on the forms provided by the
commission. The registration report shall include such information as
prescribed by the commission, including the water use permit number; the
location of the well; the diameter of the well; the maximum capacity of the
well; the name of the well driller who constructed the well; and the name of
the pump installation contractor who installed the pump and pumping equipment.

The commission may deny the issuance of a water
use permit under part IV, until such time as the applicant registers all wells
which the applicant owns or operates. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next